Alaska, session 34, HB254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 29.45.110 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 04 (f) The assessor may not increase the assessed value of real property by more 05 than five percent over the previous year's assessed value unless the increase is based 06 on an improvement to the real property or information about the real property that the 07 assessor did not have at the time of the previous assessment. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.